Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3508
Emeritus, defined.

Emeritus means the status of a professional geologist who relinquishes or does not renew such professional geologist's licensure under the Geologists Regulation Act and who is approved by the board to receive publications and use the honorary title professional geologist emeritus.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 56;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 6.